Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 45e. new text end new text begin Road test. new text end new text begin "Road test" means the actual physical demonstration of skills and ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle. As appropriate, a road test includes demonstration of ability to perform an inspection of a vehicle and equipment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.13, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Test scheduling. The commissioner must not schedule or reserve recurring time with a public, private, or commercial driver education program for purposes of administering deleted text begin skills ordeleted text end road tests to a class D deleted text begin or commercialdeleted text end driver's license applicant. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.3213, is amended to read: 171.3213 THIRD-PARTY TESTING OF deleted text begin SCHOOL BUSdeleted text end new text begin CERTAINnew text end DRIVERS. new text begin (a) new text end A school district that is a third-party testing program and owns or operates school buses may enter into an agreement with other school districts tonew text begin administer the roadnew text end testnew text begin fornew text end the other districts' school bus driver employees. A school bus company that is a third-party testing program and owns or operates school buses may enter into an agreement with other school bus companies tonew text begin administer the roadnew text end testnew text begin fornew text end the other companies' school bus driver employees. new text begin (b) A third-party testing program may enter into an agreement with a public, private, or commercial driver education program to administer the road test for a commercial driver's license, and any necessary associated endorsements, to a student enrolled at the driver education program. new text end new text begin (c)new text end A third-party testing programnew text begin that performs testing under this sectionnew text end may be reimbursed by the tested driver's school district deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin , school busnew text end companynew text begin , or driver education programnew text end . new text begin (d)new text end The agreementnew text begin under this sectionnew text end must be submitted to the commissioner for approval. A certified third-party tester must be employed by deleted text begin a school district or a school bus company providingdeleted text end new text begin the third-party testing program that providesnew text end the testing services. Sec. 4. new text begin [171.45] COMMERCIAL DRIVER TRAINING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Award recipient" means an individual who receives an award of financial assistance under the program. new text end new text begin (c) "CDL training" means education and training for purposes of an individual to operate a motor vehicle under a commercial driver's license or related endorsement. new text end new text begin (d) "Commercial driver training school" has the meaning given in section 171.33, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (e) "Driver training school" means a commercial driver training school or a postsecondary school that provides CDL training. new text end new text begin (f) "Postsecondary school" means a postsecondary college or university that provides a driver education program that is exempt from approval or licensure by the commissioner under rules adopted by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (g) "Program" means the commercial driver training assistance program established in this section. new text end new text begin (h) "Registered employer" means an employer that the commissioner has registered as a participant in the program. new text end new text begin (i) "Registered provider" means a driver training school that the commissioner has registered as a participant in the program. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program establishment. new text end new text begin Subject to available funds, the commissioner must implement a commercial driver training assistance program to provide financial support for individuals to receive education and training to operate a motor vehicle under a commercial driver's license or related endorsement. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Program administration. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish program requirements in conformance with this section, which must include but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) establishing procedures to allocate financial assistance on a first-come, first-served basis to: new text end new text begin (i) an individual under subdivision 8; or new text end new text begin (ii) a motor carrier under subdivision 9; new text end new text begin (2) publishing a manual on the program that describes requirements and procedures; new text end new text begin (3) establishing standards for calculation of stipends for living expenses; and new text end new text begin (4) maintaining functionality and information for the program on the department's website that includes: new text end new text begin (i) an overview of the program; new text end new text begin (ii) a summary of expenditures and awards of financial assistance; new text end new text begin (iii) methods for submission of applications under subdivisions 4 to 6; new text end new text begin (iv) listings of registered providers and registered employers, with appropriate detail and descriptions; and new text end new text begin (v) methods for submission of reports under subdivision 11. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not expend more than three percent of funds made available in a fiscal year under this section on program administration. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligibility for assistance. new text end new text begin To be eligible to receive financial assistance under the program, an individual must: new text end new text begin (1) submit an application for financial assistance that is approved by the commissioner, which must include: new text end new text begin (i) identification of at least two motor carriers with whom the applicant has performed a job shadow involving operation of a commercial motor vehicle; and new text end new text begin (ii) a summary of work plans or career pathway goals involving commercial driving; new text end new text begin (2) possess a valid Minnesota driver's license; new text end new text begin (3) be a citizen of the United States; new text end new text begin (4) be a resident of this state; new text end new text begin (5) be 18 years of age or older; new text end new text begin (6) meet the requirements of an applicant for a class A, class B, or class C commercial driver's license under section 171.162; and new text end new text begin (7) not have had a driver's license suspended or revoked for a driving-related violation within the last five years. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Driver training schools. new text end new text begin To be a registered provider, a driver training school must: new text end new text begin (1) submit a registration application to the commissioner; new text end new text begin (2) provide CDL training in compliance with the requirements under Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, part 380, subpart F, or successor requirements; new text end new text begin (3) be listed on the training provider registry maintained by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration; and new text end new text begin (4) be in good standing, as determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Employers. new text end new text begin To be a registered employer, an employer must: new text end new text begin (1) submit a registration application to the commissioner; new text end new text begin (2) agree to: new text end new text begin (i) provide or participate in job shadowing, ride-alongs, and career exploration events; and new text end new text begin (ii) submit information to the commissioner on individuals and activities involved under item (i); new text end new text begin (3) offer supplemental driver instruction or another form of entry-level driver support for the first year of an award recipient's employment; and new text end new text begin (4) unless the employer is self-insured, provide an approval from an insurer that the employer may hire a person who has recently obtained a commercial driver's license. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Applications; denials; removals. new text end new text begin (a) An application submitted under subdivisions 4 to 6 must be in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) Following a registration application submitted under subdivision 5 or 6, the commissioner must register or deny registration for the applicant. On a determination of good cause, the commissioner may remove a registered provider or a registered employer. The commissioner must establish a process for an applicant, registered provider, or registered employer to initiate a review of the denial or removal. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Financial assistance; awards to individuals. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may only award financial assistance to an individual who: new text end new text begin (1) meets the requirements under subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (2) receives CDL training from a registered provider; and new text end new text begin (3) agrees to the terms of financial assistance and repayment established by the commissioner as provided under subdivision 10. new text end new text begin (b) Subject to available funds, the amount awarded to an individual must equal: new text end new text begin (1) the total customarily charged by the registered provider for education and training specifically related to a commercial driver's license, which may include but is not limited to tuition, books and course materials, and associated fees; plus new text end new text begin (2) a stipend for reasonable living expenses, as determined by the commissioner; less new text end new text begin (3) any amount of financial aid or deductions that are reasonably applicable to reduce the total that would otherwise be charged for the training and education. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may make payments to an award recipient or to a registered provider who provides driver training to an award recipient. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Financial assistance; reimbursement to motor carriers. new text end new text begin (a) A motor carrier is eligible to receive financial assistance under the program. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may only provide reimbursement to a motor carrier that: new text end new text begin (1) submits a request for reimbursement that is approved by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (2) is a private driver training school that provides CDL training and meets the requirements under subdivision 5, clauses (2) to (4); new text end new text begin (3) is a registered employer; and new text end new text begin (4) agrees to the terms of financial assistance and repayment established by the commissioner as provided under subdivision 10. new text end new text begin (c) Subject to available funds, the amount of reimbursement must equal the costs customarily incurred by the motor carrier for CDL training of only those individuals who meet the requirements under subdivision 4, clauses (2) to (7), which include but are not limited to instructor salaries, books and course materials, vehicle maintenance and operating costs, fuel, and insurance. new text end new text begin (d) The reimbursement under paragraph (c) must not exceed $....... per individual. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Financial assistance; terms and repayment. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish terms of financial assistance and repayment that include requiring that the applicable individual: new text end new text begin (1) successfully completes driver training with a registered provider or a motor carrier under subdivision 9; new text end new text begin (2) is issued a commercial driver's license within six months of training completion under clause (1); new text end new text begin (3) is employed with one or more registered employers for a total period of at least one year in a position that requires a commercial driver's license, which must occur within 24 months of training completion under clause (1); and new text end new text begin (4) does not lose motor vehicle operating privileges during the period under clauses (1) to (3). new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must establish requirements and a schedule for prorated repayment of financial assistance for an applicable individual who does not meet the terms under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) The following entities must submit quarterly reporting information in the form and manner specified by the commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) an award recipient; new text end new text begin (2) a registered provider that provides education and training to an award recipient; new text end new text begin (3) a registered employer that employs an award recipient; and new text end new text begin (4) a motor carrier that receives financial assistance. new text end new text begin (b) Reports are required under paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2), during the period that an award recipient receives financial assistance. Reports are required under paragraph (a), clause (3), for a period of one year following initial hiring of an award recipient. Reports are required under paragraph (a), clause (4), for a period of one year following completion of driver training. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COMMERCIAL DRIVER TRAINING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for the commercial driver training assistance program under Minnesota Statutes, section 171.45. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may expend money in the driver and vehicle services technology account in the special revenue fund for information systems purposes related to the commercial driver training assistance program. new text end